zh-CN: 射击支架托架设计: 夹具式; 托架式; 叉形; 鞍形; U 型支架; V 型支架; 其他
hu: Lőbotvilla kialakítása: Bilincs; Bölcső; Villa; Nyereg; U-tartó; V-tartó; Egyéb
sl-SI: Zasnova vilic strelske palice: Spona; Zibelka; Vilice; Sedlo; Oblika U; Oblika V; Drugo
ko: 슈팅 스틱 요크 디자인: 클램프; 크래들; 포크; 안장형; U형 요크; V형 요크; 기타
vi: Thiết kế càng đỡ gậy bắn súng: Kẹp; Nôi; Nĩa; Yên; Chạc chữ U; Chạc chữ V; Khác
ru: Конструкция вилки стрелковой опоры: Зажим; Колыбель; Вилка; Седло; U-образная; V-образная; Другое
fr: Type de fourche du bâton de tir: Pince; Berceau; Fourche; Selle; Embout en U; Embout en V; Autre
hr-HR: Dizajn jarma za palicu za gađanje: Stezaljka; Postolje; Vilica; Sedlo; U-nosač; V-nosač; Drugo
it: Design del supporto per bastone da tiro: Morsetto; Culla; Forcella; Sella; Forcella a U; Forcella a V; Altro
pt-BR: Forquilha de bastão de tiro design: Abraçadeira; Berço; Garfo; Sela; Apoio em U; Apoio em V; Outros
pt-PT: Design do garfo do bastão de tiro: Braçadeira; Berço; Forqueta; Assento; Forquilha em U; Forquilha em V; Outro
pl: Konstrukcja widełek podpórki pod broń: Zacisk; Kołyska; Widełki; Siodło; Widełki w kształcie litery U; Widełki w kształcie litery V; Inne
zh-TW: 射擊支架軛架設計: 夾鉗式; 搖籃式; 叉形; 鞍座式; U 型叉; V 型叉; 其他
cs: Design třmenu střelecké hole: Svorka; Kolébka; Vidlice; Sedlo; U-podpěra; V-podpěra; Jiné
tr: Atış çubuğu yoke tasarımı: Kelepçe; Beşik; Çatal; Eyer; U boyunduruk; V boyunduruk; Diğer
es: Diseño de la horquilla del bastón de tiro: Abrazadera; Cuna; Horquilla; Montura; Soporte en U; Soporte en V; Otro
el: Σχεδίαση κεφαλής στηρίγματος όπλου: Σφιγκτήρας; Βάση συγκράτησης; Πιρούνι; Σέλα; Διχάλα U; Διχάλα V; Άλλο
de: Design des Schießstockjochs: Klemme; Wiege; Gabel; Sattel; U-Gabel; V-Gabel; Sonstige
ro-RO: Design al suportului tip V pentru bastonul de tragere: Clemă; Leagăn; Furcă; Șa; Furcă în formă de U; Furcă în formă de V; Altele
da: Gaffeldesign for skydestøtte: Klemme; Vugge; Gaffel; Sadel; U-gaffel; V-gaffel; Andet
lt-LT: Šaudymo lazdos atramos dizainas: Spaustuvas; Lopšys; Šakutė; Balnelis; U formos atrama; V formos atrama; Kita
sv: Design av ok för skjutkäppar: Klämma; Vagga; Gaffel; Sadel; U-stöd; V-stöd; Övrigt
ja: シューティングスティックヨーク設計: クランプ; クレードル; フォーク; サドル; U字ヨーク; V字ヨーク; その他
en: Shooting stick yoke design: Clamp; Cradle; Fork; Saddle; U-yoke; V-yoke; Other
nb: Design av åk for skytestang: Klemme; Vugge; Gaffel; Sadel; U-gaffel; V-gaffel; Annet
th: การออกแบบโครงยึดไม้ยิงปืน: แคลมป์; แท่นรับ; ง่าม; อานรอง; โยกรูปตัว U; โยกรูปตัว V; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Дизайн на вилката/ложата на опората за стрелба: Скоба; Люлка; Вилка; Седло; U-образна; V-образна; Друго
nl: Schietstok jukontwerp: Klem; Wieg; Vork; Zadel; U-steun; V-steun; Overig
fi: Ampumatuen haarukka: Puristin; Kehto; Haarukka; Satula; U-kannatin; V-kannatin; Muu
sk-SK: Dizajn vidlice streleckej palice: Svorka; Kolíska; Vidlica; Sedlo; Opierka v tvare U; Opierka v tvare V; Iné